Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 3. Child Care Facilities Financing Program

§ 3521.
Child Care Facilities Financing Program established.

A Child Care Facilities Loan Financing Program is established to facilitate the development or expansion of child care facilities in this State.

The Program shall be administered by the Office of Economic Opportunity within the Agency of Human Services.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 112;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 3522.
Loan program.

The State Economic Opportunity Office shall administer a low-interest loan program.

Loans may be made to persons unable to obtain conventional financing for the purpose of establishing or expanding or renovating a child care facility in this State. The terms of the loans shall be determined by the State Economic Opportunity Office, but shall not be made in an amount in excess of $10,000.00 to any single applicant, nor at a rate to exceed eight and one-half percent, simple interest per annum.

A Child Care Facilities Financing Revolving Loan Fund shall be established for the Child Care Facilities Financing Program within the State Economic Opportunity Office of the Agency of Human Services. The Fund shall contain appropriations provided for that purpose and all repayments of principal and interest of loans under this section. Interest earnings may be used for administration of this Program.

The Director of the Office of Economic Opportunity shall establish by rule, the criteria, conditions, and procedures that will be used in administering the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1995, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 113.

§ 3523.
Repealed. 1995, No. 188, § 4.